Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1432
Salary and benefits data; collection.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, the commission shall annually collect salary and benefits data from each Nebraska public postsecondary institution.

(2) Each Nebraska public postsecondary institution shall electronically submit salary and benefits data for the following employee groups:

(a) Administrators;

(b) Instructional faculty employed on a full-time basis; and

(c) Adjunct faculty and other part-time instructional staff.

(3) The commission shall require data to be reported in a standardized format prescribed by the commission to ensure statewide consistency and year-to-year comparability.

Laws 2026, LB956, § 3.
July 1, 2026